North Dakota, session 69, HB1175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 54-55-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-55-01. Commission on uniform state laws - Membership.
1. The commission on uniform state laws consists of an:
a. An individual engaged in the practice of law in this state, the;
b. The dean or a full-time member of the faculty of the law school of the university of North
Dakota, a;
c. A law-trained judge of a court of record in this state, a;
d. A member of the house of representatives and a;
e. A member of the senate of the legislative assembly,; and a
f. A member of the legislative council.
2. The attorney general may appoint a member of the commission. The commission also
consists of any residents of this state who, because of long service in the cause of uniformity
of state legislation, have been elected life members of the national conference of
commissioners on uniform state laws, also known as the national uniform laws commission,
and may also consist of any residents of this state who have been previously appointed to at
least five years of service on the commission.
3. Except for the membermembers appointed by the attorney general, the members of the
legislative assembly, the member of the legislative council, any members appointed under
subsection 9 , and life members, commissioners must be appointed by the governor for terms
of four years each, commencing on the first day of September following each presidential
election, and shall serve until their respective successors are appointed. Commissioners first
appointed after July 21, 2011, must be residents of the state.
4. The members of the legislative assembly on the commission must be appointed by the
legislative management for a term not to exceed fourtwo years as prescribed by the legislative
management, and the member of the legislative council must be appointed by the chairman of
the legislative management.
5. The term of a commissioner commences on the first day of September.
6. The term of the member appointed by the attorney general may not extend beyond the term of
that attorney general.
7. All commissioners must be residents of the state, except for the commissioners who have
been elected life members of the national conference of commissioners on uniform state laws.

H. B. NO. 1175 - PAGE 2
8. To be eligible for appointment, an individual must be a licensed attorney and in good standing
with the state bar association of North Dakota at the time of first appointment.
9. If a member of the house of representatives or the senate is not eligible to serve as a
commissioner under this chapter, the legislative management may appoint an individual who
is eligible.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 54-55-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-55-03. Meeting and organization.
The commissioners shall meet at least once each two-year period and shall organize by electing
one of their number aselect a chairman, vice chairman, and another asa secretary. The chairman and
secretaryofficers elected under this section shall hold their respective offices for a term of two years and
until their successors are elected.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 54-55-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-55-04. Duties of commissioners and commission.
1. Each commissioner shall attend the annual meeting of the national conference of
commissioners on uniform state laws, also known as the national uniform law commission,
and shall promote uniformity in state laws on those subjects where uniformity may be deemed
desirable and practicable. The commission shall also promote as far as practicable the
uniform judicial application and construction of all uniform state laws.
2. During the interim between legislative sessions, the commission may submit its
recommendations for enactment of uniform and model laws to the legislative management for
its review and recommendation. Commissioners shall provide suchthe assistance to the
legislative management as the legislative management requests with respect to its review of
uniform and model laws.
3. During each biennial legislative session, and at any other time as the commission may deem
proper, the commission shall report to the legislative assembly an account of its transactions
and its advice and recommendations for legislation. The report must include the
recommendations of the legislative management with respect to uniform and model laws
recommended by the commission.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 54-55-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-55-05. No compensation for commissioners - Commissioners entitled to reimbursement .
The
1. Except as provided for members of the legislative assembly under section 54 - 03 - 20, the
commissioners shall serve without compensation for services as commissioners.
2. The commissioners who are appointed to the commission and the commissioners who have
been elected life members of the national conference of commissioners on uniform state laws
also known as the national uniform law commission, except those who are appointed by virtue
of having served five years on the commission but who have not served at least twenty years
in the legislative assembly, are entitled to be reimbursed, from moneys appropriated for that
purpose, for necessary expenses incurred in performing their duties at the rates provided in
sections 44-08-04 and 54-06-09.

H. B. NO. 1175 - PAGE 3
3. Warrant-checks for expense reimbursement must be prepared by the office of management
and budget upon vouchers submitted by the commissioners.

H. B. NO. 1175 - PAGE 4
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1175.
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State